Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1832YH (9) 91 jda/jh H.F. 460 Section 1. Section 256.11, subsection 1, paragraphs a and b, 1 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. If a school offers a prekindergarten program, the program 3 shall be designed to help children to work and play with 4 others, to express themselves, to learn to use and manage their 5 bodies, and to extend their interests and understanding of the 6 world about them. The prekindergarten program shall encourage 7 cooperative efforts between home and school and shall focus 8 on community resources. The prekindergarten program shall 9 include at least ninety minutes of play-based learning during 10 each half school day and at least one hundred eighty minutes 11 of play-based learning during each full school day. Except 12 as otherwise provided in this subsection , a prekindergarten 13 teacher shall hold a license certifying that the holder is 14 qualified to teach in prekindergarten. A nonpublic school 15 which offers only a prekindergarten may, but is not required 16 to, seek and obtain accreditation. 17 b. If the board of directors of a school district contracts 18 for the operation of a prekindergarten program, the program 19 shall be under the oversight of an appropriately licensed 20 teacher. If the program contracted with was in existence 21 on July 1, 1989, oversight of the program shall be provided 22 by the district. If the program contracted with was not 23 in existence on July 1, 1989, the director of the program 24 shall be a licensed teacher and the director shall provide 25 program oversight. Any director of a program contracted 26 with by a school district under this section who is not a 27 licensed teacher is required to register with the department of 28 education. The prekindergarten program shall include at least 29 ninety minutes of play-based learning during each half school 30 day and at least one hundred eighty minutes of play-based 31 learning during each full school day. 32 Sec. 2. Section 256.11, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 2. The kindergarten program shall include experiences 35 -1- LSB 1832YH (9) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 460 designed to develop healthy emotional and social habits and 1 growth in the language arts and communication skills, as well 2 as a capacity for the completion of individual tasks, and 3 protect and increase physical well-being with attention given 4 to experiences relating to the development of life skills and, 5 subject to section 279.80 , age-appropriate and research-based 6 human growth and development. The kindergarten program shall 7 include at least forty-five minutes of play-based learning 8 during each school day. A kindergarten teacher shall be 9 licensed to teach in kindergarten. An accredited nonpublic 10 school must meet the requirements of this subsection only if 11 the nonpublic school offers a kindergarten program; provided, 12 however, that section 279.80 shall not apply to a nonpublic 13 school. 14 Sec. 3. Section 256.11, subsection 19, Code 2025, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0b. âPlay-based learningâ means a 17 pedagogical approach that emphasizes play and child-directed 18 experiences in promoting learning and that includes 19 developmentally appropriate strategies that can be integrated 20 with existing learning standards. âPlay-based learningâ 21 includes social imitation, learning through expression, and 22 unstructured play within the classroom setting where it is a 23 time for the discovery of each childâs individual talents, 24 abilities, and needs. âPlay-based learningâ does not include 25 time spent in recess or as part of a physical education course 26 or instruction. 27 Sec. 4. Section 256C.3, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 28 by adding the following new paragraph: 29 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. Provision for at least ninety minutes of 30 play-based learning during each half school day and at least 31 one hundred eighty minutes of play-based learning during each 32 full school day. For purposes of this paragraph, âplay-based 33 learningâ means the same as defined in section 256.11, 34 subsection 19. 35 -2- LSB 1832YH (9) 91 jda/jh 2/ 3 H.F. 460 Sec. 5. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code 1 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (01) The educational standards 3 established in section 256.11, subsections 1 and 2, related to 4 play-based learning. 5 Sec. 6. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 6 by adding the following new paragraph: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 8 requirements of section 256.11, subsections 1 and 2, relating 9 to play-based learning in the same manner as a school district. 10